Hawaii statutes.
§353-10 Intake service centers. [Repeal
and reenactment on July 1, 2018. L 2013, c 67, §2.] (a) There shall be
within the department of public safety, an intake service center for adults in
each of the counties to screen, evaluate, and classify the admission of persons
to community correctional centers. Each center shall be directed and managed
by a manager and shall be staffed by a team of psychiatrists, social workers,
technicians, and other personnel as may be necessary. The director of public safety
may appoint full-time or part-time professional and clerical staff or contract
for professional services.

(b) The centers shall:

(1) Provide orientation, guidance, and technical
services;

(2) Provide social-medical-psychiatric-psychological
diagnostic evaluation;

(3) Conduct internal pretrial risk assessments on
adult offenders within three working days of admission to a community
correctional center which shall then be provided to the court for its
consideration; provided that this paragraph shall not apply to persons subject
to county or state detainers, holds, or persons detained without bail, persons
detained for probation violation, persons facing revocation of bail or
supervised release, and persons who have had a pretrial risk assessment completed
prior to admission to a community correctional center. For purposes of this
[paragraph], "pretrial risk assessment" means an objective,
research-based, validated assessment tool that measures a defendant's risk of
flight and risk of criminal conduct while on pretrial release pending
adjudication;

(4) Provide
correctional prescription program planning and security classification;

(5) Provide other personal and correctional services
as needed for both detained and committed persons;

(6) Monitor and record the progress of persons
assigned to correctional facilities who undergo further treatment or who
participate in prescribed correctional programs;

(7) Provide continuing supervision and control of
persons ordered to be placed on pretrial supervision by the court and persons
ordered by the director; and

(8) Provide pretrial bail reports to the courts on
adult offenders that are consented to by the defendant or that are ordered by
the court. The pretrial bail reports shall be confidential and shall not be
deemed to be public records. A copy of a pretrial bail report shall be
provided only:

(A) To the defendant or defendant's counsel;

(B) To the prosecuting attorney;

(C) To the department of public safety;

(D) To any psychiatrist, psychologist, or
other treatment practitioner who is treating the defendant pursuant to a court
order;

(E) Upon request, to the adult client
services branch; and

(F) In accordance with applicable laws,
persons, or entities doing research. [L 1987, c 338, pt of §3; am L 1989, c
211, §8; am L 1996, c 130, §2; am L Sp 2009, c 24, §1; am L 2012, c 76, §3, c
139, §§3, 14(4) and c 141, §1; am L 2013, c 67, §1]

Note

The 2013 amendment is exempt from the repeal and reenactment
condition of L 2012, c 139, §14, as amended by L 2013, c 67, §2. L 2013, c 67,
§4.

The repeal and reenactment note at this section in the main
volume is amended to read as follows: "[Repeal and reenactment on July 1,
2018. L 2013, c 67, §2; L 2016, c 231, §69.]".

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next